Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation  shall prepare and submit a progress
report on the implementation and utilization of the recommendations  that are identified in
the report prepared by  department titled “Blueprint for Urban Design” and dated January
2020. In preparing the report, the department shall  solicit feedback from cities, counties and
community planning organizations that have been impacted by a state  highway project that
has implemented the Blueprint for Urban Design  and how that project impacted rural
downtown districts where the state highway also serves as the rural community’s main
street.
(2) The report must include:
(a) The number of state highway projects that utilized the Blueprint for Urban Design;
(b) Examples of how the Blueprint for Urban Design was incorporated into state  highway
project planning, design and construction in rural communities; and
(c) A review of the feedback received.
(3) The department shall  submit the report required by this section to the Joint Com-
mittee on Transportation in the manner  provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September
15, 2022.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3304 (HB 3304-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 5, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 12, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3304 (HB 3304-A) Page 2